

























Trexquant Investment LP Takes Position in Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Caterpillar Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Caterpillar Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Martingale Asset Management L P Decreases Position in Raytheon Company (NYSE:RTN)
Trexquant Investment LP Takes Position in Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT)
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Acquires 116 Shares of Sturm, Ruger & Company, Inc. (NYSE:RGR)
Gannett Co. (GCI) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.31
Remark Media (MARK) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.26
Insider Selling: Input Capital Corp (INP) Insider Sells 7,100 Shares of Stock
Insider Selling: Aralez Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ARLZ) Insider Sells 7,720 Shares of Stock
American International Group Inc. Reduces Stake in Consolidated Communications Holdings, Inc. (CNSL)
Bank Of New York Mellon Corporation (The) (BK) Shares Sold by Fort Washington Investment Advisors Inc. OH
Matrix Asset Advisors Inc. NY Increases Stake in D/B/A Chubb Limited New (CB)
Asset Management One Co. Ltd. Reduces Stake in Corning Incorporated (GLW)
ImmunoGen, Inc. (IMGN) Shares Bought by Neuberger Berman Group LLC
Stellar Diamonds PLC (STEL) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Shore Capital
Analyzing Norwegian Cruise Line Holdings (NCLH) & Monarch Casino & Resort (MCRI)
Analyzing FLIR Systems (FLIR) & NAPCO Security Technologies (NSSC)
Weight Watchers International (WTW) vs. NutriSystem (NTRI) Financial Contrast
OvaScience Inc. (NASDAQ:OVAS) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Brokerages
SIG plc (SHI) Price Target Raised to GBX 155 at Deutsche Bank AG
Zacks: Brokerages Expect MGP Ingredients, Inc. (NASDAQ:MGPI) to Post $0.40 EPS
Brokerages Expect Citigroup Inc. (C) Will Post Quarterly Sales of $17.49 Billion


 


Trexquant Investment LP Takes Position in Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 24th, 2017 // No Comments 

Trexquant Investment LP bought a new stake in Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The institutional investor bought 4,288 shares of the industrial products company’s stock, valued at approximately $398,000. 
Several other hedge funds also recently made changes to their positions in CAT. Norges Bank acquired a new stake in Caterpillar during the fourth quarter worth about $414,361,000. UBS Asset Management Americas Inc. increased its stake in Caterpillar by 6.5% in the first quarter. UBS Asset Management Americas Inc. now owns 2,362,430 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $219,139,000 after buying an additional 143,477 shares in the last quarter. Swiss National Bank increased its stake in Caterpillar by 27.4% in the first quarter. Swiss National Bank now owns 2,073,016 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $192,293,000 after buying an additional 445,900 shares in the last quarter. Sumitomo Mitsui Trust Holdings Inc. increased its stake in Caterpillar by 0.5% in the first quarter. Sumitomo Mitsui Trust Holdings Inc. now owns 1,972,478 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $182,967,000 after buying an additional 10,285 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Teachers Advisors LLC increased its stake in Caterpillar by 2.9% in the fourth quarter. Teachers Advisors LLC now owns 1,063,231 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $98,604,000 after buying an additional 29,493 shares in the last quarter. 70.70% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 




Shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (CAT) traded down 0.68% during trading on Friday, reaching $106.59. 4,258,115 shares of the company’s stock traded hands. The company’s 50-day moving average is $106.32 and its 200 day moving average is $99.06. Caterpillar, Inc. has a 52-week low of $78.34 and a 52-week high of $110.00. The company’s market cap is $62.79 billion. Caterpillar also saw unusually large options trading on Thursday. Stock investors purchased 14,052 put options on the company. This represents an increase of 107% compared to the average daily volume of 6,777 put options.


 Get Caterpillar Inc. alerts:



Caterpillar (NYSE:CAT) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Tuesday, April 25th. The industrial products company reported $1.28 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.62 by $0.66. Caterpillar had a positive return on equity of 16.46% and a negative net margin of 0.38%. The company had revenue of $9.82 billion during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $9.27 billion. During the same period last year, the company earned $0.67 earnings per share. Caterpillar’s revenue was up 3.8% on a year-over-year basis. Equities analysts forecast that Caterpillar, Inc. will post $4.27 EPS for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Saturday, August 19th. Shareholders of record on Thursday, July 20th will be paid a $0.78 dividend. This is a positive change from Caterpillar’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.77. The ex-dividend date is Tuesday, July 18th. This represents a $3.12 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.93%. Caterpillar’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently -1,155.51%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This piece was reported by BNB Daily and is owned by of BNB Daily. If you are viewing this piece on another website, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of United States and international trademark & copyright laws. The legal version of this piece can be viewed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/24/trexquant-investment-lp-purchases-new-stake-in-caterpillar-inc-nysecat-updated-updated.html. 
A number of research firms have issued reports on CAT. Credit Suisse Group reissued a “buy” rating and issued a $123.00 price objective on shares of Caterpillar in a report on Thursday, June 22nd. Vetr downgraded shares of Caterpillar from a “sell” rating to a “strong sell” rating and set a $86.90 price objective for the company. in a report on Tuesday, April 25th. Robert W. Baird set a $102.00 price objective on shares of Caterpillar and gave the company a “hold” rating in a report on Wednesday, April 12th. Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) raised shares of Caterpillar from a “buy” rating to a “conviction-buy” rating and set a $120.00 price objective for the company in a report on Tuesday, April 4th. Finally, Bank of America Corporation set a $120.00 price objective on shares of Caterpillar and gave the company a “buy” rating in a report on Tuesday, June 20th. Two research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, thirteen have given a hold rating, eleven have given a buy rating and one has assigned a strong buy rating to the company. The company currently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $97.72.
About Caterpillar
 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Caterpillar Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Caterpillar Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 




































Trexquant Investment LP | Careers At Trexquant























 














Careers
Global Alpha Researcher (GAR)
Many academically-talented high-achieving individuals wonder if a career in quantitative finance is right for them.  One of the most important and popular roles in quantitative finance is Alpha research, which involves developing profitable trading signals based on real-world data.  Unfortunately, quantitative trading is a tight-knit industry and it is difficult to find detailed information about building a successful career in this field.  To address this problem, Trexquant created the Global Alpha Research Program to provide a platform for career growth and advancement and give participants direct experience in buy-side Alpha research.
Job Description
We seek bright and passionate scientists, mathematicians, and engineers to join our talented team of Global Alpha Researchers to conduct exciting Alpha research.  Our ideal candidate is analytical and creative, as well as persistent at finding strong Alphas.  
Benefits



Monthly compensation plus performance bonus
Flexibility to work conveniently from anywhere in the world and during any time of the day
Invaluable learning and networking opportunities with global hedge fund managers
Access to proprietary technology platforms for exploring and converting ideas into signals that are tradable in the real world
Mentoring and guidance from experienced quantitative researchers
Full-time offers for top performers


Responsibilities



Develop market-neutral, medium-frequency Alphas that predict future stock returns
Investigate and implement recent academic research
Develop algorithms to filter and combine Alphas
Parse data sets to be used for future alpha development
Apply machine learning techniques to alpha discovery and portfolio construction


If you think a career in quantitative finance is for you, send us your resume to careers@trexquant.com
 


Data ScientistOpen or Close



 Learn and explore a wide range of financial data sets that are used to develop signals for systematic quantitative strategies. 

Develop a framework to automatically download and monitor hundreds of data sources that are vital to trading and research.

Create data visualization tools to understand large data sets, such as order-by-order tick data.

Develop machine learning techniques to look for patterns in large data sets.

Strong attention to detail and problem-solving skills are critical for this position.

Linux, Bash, and Python are tools most often used in this position.


Director of Global BusinessOpen or Close



Source and identify research office locations.

Recruit researchers from top universities worldwide.

Help researchers collaborate effectively with USA researchers.

Work with local service providers to handle business items such as payroll and taxes.

Communicate regularly with the USA office to discuss recruiting and expansion ideas.

Produce regular progress reports.

Monitor regulatory issues that may impact the regional office.


Execution System DeveloperOpen or Close



Develop low - latency, low - slippage algorithms in C++ to run on co - located hardware to execute the fund’s medium - frequency order flow across thousands of U.S. equities symbols per day.

Develop a framework to quantitatively measure and test the quality of different order types, venues, algorithm types, and execution schedules.

Strong C++, Linux, and Python software development skills.

Prior experience developing low - market - impact execution systems is a plus.


Independent TraderOpen or Close



Seeking individuals who have traded, implemented, or backtested medium-frequency or high-frequency equity strategies.

Implement the strategies and integrate them into our execution system.

Bonus is based on strategy performance.

Opportunities to collaborate with the Trexquant team are available but not required (e.g., work with Alpha researchers to develop new signals).


Linux System AdministratorOpen or Close



Ensure our Red Hat / CentOS Linux servers are stable, safe, and efficient.

Configure and monitor Data Center operations across multiple geographic locations.

Plan, install, and administer a Disaster Recovery system for our Linux environment.

Troubleshoot server problems with researchers and traders.

Design and implement information security systems.

Create robust backup processes for Linux systems.

Concisely document the firm's infrastructure.

Strong interest in Linux systems and desire to build a robust and scalable infrastructure.

2 or more years administrative experience with Linux (Redhat 4+, CentOS).

2 or more years experience in Bash shell scripting.

1 year of database experience (preferably MySQL).

Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience.


Portfolio ManagerOpen or Close



Develop machine-learning algorithms to filter and assign weights to thousands of return forecasts of stocks.

Investigate and implement recent academic research.

Competitive salary plus bonus tied to the performance of algorithms you develop.

Opportunity to learn and apply a variety of machine-learning algorithms to quantitative trading.

Invaluable learning and networking opportunities with global hedge fund managers.

Mentoring and guidance from experienced quantitative researchers.


Production EngineerOpen or Close



Manage infrastructure and operate systems used to generate signals and trade medium-frequency statistical arbitrage strategies.

 Develop methods to streamline production processes and enhance stability.

Strong Linux, Bash shell scripting, and Python skills are required.  Working knowledge of Matlab is beneficial.

Production is a mission-critical process that requires a dependable individual with strong attention to detail.


Simulation System DeveloperOpen or Close



Improve the realism, functionality, speed, and scale of the system for simulating Alphas and Strategies.

Create new methods to develop, backtest, and visualize Alphas and Strategies.

Proficiency in Matlab, Linux, and Python is desired.

Excellent opportunity to learn the fundamentals of quantitative trading.


Software DeveloperOpen or Close



Improve the scale and performance of our medium-frequency statistical arbitrage infrastructure (large data jobs, building thousands of trading signals per day, performing high-memory simulations, etc.)

Continue expansion of our low-latency trading system (data feeds, exchange connectivity, etc.)

Source available vendors/platforms for data feeds, co-location of servers, research clusters, etc.

Collaborate with researchers to implement algorithms.

Constantly improve the speed of the trading system and ease of use.

2+ years of hands on development experience

Strong Linux skills

C++ and Python software development expertise

Prior experience with developing U.S. equities trading systems is a plus.

Ability and willingness to adapt to new challenges in a dynamic environment with shifting priorities

Process-driven with strong attention to detail


 

For quantitative research positions, strong programming ability is required, along with curiosity and diligence to define and solve complex problems. While prior experience in quantitative finance is a plus, candidates without direct finance experience are encouraged to apply.
We are located in Stamford, CT (a commutable 45 minute train ride from New York City). Applications from both experienced candidates as well as graduate and undergraduate students are welcome. A small number of internships for highly - qualified students are also available.
To apply or learn more please email: careers@trexquant.com























Trexquant Investment LP | Quantitative Investment Firm
























 















Trexquant is a quantitative investment firm focused on developing and trading statistically-based medium-frequency equity strategies 






















Trexquant Investment LP | Alpha Research Competition
























 
















Trexquant Alpha Research Competition




Trexquant Summer 2016 Alpha Research Competition has now ended. Stay tuned for our next competition!

 

Background
To participate in the competition, all that is required is an interest in financial markets and enough programming experience to allow you to translate your ideas into MATLAB-like code.  The objective of the competition is to create a variety of uncorrelated signals, which we call Alphas, that are profitable across varying market conditions.

Competition participants will use our intuitive web-based platform, Trexsim, to develop and backtest Alphas, which are statistical arbitrage signals for trading global equities.
Trexsim has a variety of pre-cleaned data and built-in functions available, along with a framework to develop custom functions for data manipulation, which allows participants to rapidly iterate and backtest a variety of ideas.  Competition participants thus avoid time-consuming data cleaning and simulation development effort, and instead directly focus on working with a variety of data to create useful trading signals.
Senior quantitative researchers from Trexquant will conduct online tutorials and host weekly Q&A sessions to help entrants achieve the goal of finding profitable, uncorrelated Alphas.
The competition lasts for seven weeks.  At the conclusion of the event, we will score the Alphas created by each entrant, rank each candidate, and award prizes to the top performers.



Prizes
1st place: USD 5,000
2nd place: USD 4,000
3rd place: USD 3,000
4th place: USD 2,000
5th to 10th place: USD 1,000 each
 

NO PURCHASE NECESSARY TO ENTER OR WIN. VOID WHERE PROHIBITED BY LAW. To enter, you must be at least 18 and age of majority in your jurisdiction of residence. Current and former employees, interns, alpha research trainees and contractors, and their immediate family members of Sponsor or any entity involved in developing or administering the Competition are not eligible. Eligibility is subject to verification. Subject to all applicable federal, state and local laws. All taxes are responsibility of Winners. All entries become the property of Sponsor. Odds of winning depend on number and quality of eligible entries received. Other restrictions apply, see competition rules. Sponsored by Trexquant Investment LP, 300 First Stamford Place, Fourth Floor East, Stamford, CT 06902.



 
FAQ

What is an alpha?
An alpha is an algorithm that makes trading decisions based on a formula that you design using a variety of variables. Alphas are inspired by a variety of sources — such as academic publications and statistical analysis — and rely on a variety of technical, fundamental, and other data as input.
What do I need to know to develop an alpha?
You need basic knowledge of financial markets and technical skills to translate your ideas into mathematical formulas. Introductory knowledge of a scripting language, such as MATLAB, is recommended in order to translate Alpha ideas into software code.
Who can participate? 
Anyone over 18 years of age who meets the eligibility requirements.
How will alphas be evaluated?
The alphas will be evaluated using a proprietary algorithm for strong performance and diversity. Further details are in the competition rules.



 
 
 

What features does Trexsim alpha development platform have?
* Detailed tutorials on Alpha design.
* A library of common built-in functions.
* Various data sets to use as inputs to Alphas.
* Ability to develop custom operators.
* In-sample and out-of-sample back-testing.
 
Overall, Trexsim is optimized for conducting efficient research. Users spend time creating and implementing Alphas.  Sourcing and cleaning data, developing a simulator, as well as storing and tracking results, are already taken care of by Trexsim.

























Trexquant Investment LP | Our People























 














Senior Management Team Tyger ParkChief Executive Officer
Mr. Park spent 10 years at Millennium Partners and its affiliate, WorldQuant, where he served as one of three Senior Managing Directors. He was responsible for one of the largest portfolios at WorldQuant and managed a global team of over 40 researchers. Mr. Park received an M.B.A. from Cornell University, an M.S. in Computer Science from the University of Toronto, and a Bachelor of Applied Science in Electrical Engineering from Simon Fraser University.
Michael MarinicChief Operating Officer
Michael spent 8 years as the Treasurer of Two Sigma Investments, a technology company that applies a scientific method-based approach to investment management.  In this role, he designed and implemented transformational treasury and financing initiatives in support of the 10-fold growth of the company. Previously, he led the Corporate Finance function at GM Asset Management, a New York-based pension fund. Michael received a Master of Business Administration degree in Finance from McMaster University and a Bachelor of Science degree from the University of Toronto.
Joey MartinezGeneral Counsel & Chief Compliance Officer
Prior to joining Trexquant, Joey was an attorney in the Investment Management group at the law firm Schulte Roth and Zabel LLP where his practice focused on the representation of private funds (including hedge funds, private equity funds and hybrid funds) and investment advisers in connection with their structuring, formation and on-going operational needs and on regulatory and compliance matters. Previously, Joey worked as an in-house corporate attorney at Teneo Holdings LLC and Castleton Commodities International LLC.  He also previously was a judicial law clerk in the U.S. Virgin Islands on the island of St. Croix. Joey holds a J.D. from Columbia Law School. He also received a B.A., with high honors, in Comparative Literature from the University of California, Berkeley.
 




















						Qs Investors Cut By $3.82 Million Its Cae (CAE) Position; Trexquant Investment LP Raised Constellium Nv (CSTM) Holding - Bibey Post								

























 























































Trending Stock News
Penny Stock News
Market News
Stock News






Qs Investors Cut By $3.82 Million Its Cae (CAE) Position; Trexquant Investment LP Raised Constellium Nv (CSTM) Holding


					
						July 27, 2017 - By Kurt Siggers

Trexquant Investment Lp increased Constellium Nv (CSTM) stake by 587.56% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Trexquant Investment Lp acquired 88,339 shares as Constellium Nv (CSTM)’s stock declined 23.17%. The Trexquant Investment Lp holds 103,374 shares with $610,000 value, up from 15,035 last quarter. Constellium Nv now has $909.47M valuation. The stock increased 4.27% or $0.35 on July 27, reaching $8.55. About 3.10M shares traded or 229.03% up from the average. Constellium NV (NYSE:CSTM) has risen 20.46% since July 27, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 3.76% the S&P500.







Qs Investors Llc decreased Cae Inc (CAE) stake by 99.9% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Qs Investors Llc sold 294,000 shares as Cae Inc (CAE)’s stock rose 0.90%. The Qs Investors Llc holds 297 shares with $4,000 value, down from 294,297 last quarter. Cae Inc now has $4.50B valuation. The stock decreased 2.51% or $0.43 on July 27, reaching $16.69. About 475,090 shares traded or 61.69% up from the average. Cae Inc (USA) (NYSE:CAE) has risen 26.75% since July 27, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 10.05% the S&P500.
Trexquant Investment Lp decreased Parsley Energy Inc (NYSE:PE) stake by 19,800 shares to 11,900 valued at $419,000 in 2016Q4. It also reduced Itron Inc (NASDAQ:ITRI) stake by 9,062 shares and now owns 5,739 shares. Bunge Limited (NYSE:BG) was reduced too. 
Among 11 analysts covering Constellium NV (NYSE:CSTM), 8 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 3 Hold. Therefore 73% are positive. Constellium NV had 13 analyst reports since August 6, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. The rating was initiated by Credit Suisse on Friday, March 11 with “Outperform”. On Monday, October 5 the stock rating was maintained by Citigroup with “Neutral”. The firm has “Buy” rating given on Thursday, August 6 by Deutsche Bank. The rating was maintained by JP Morgan on Wednesday, March 16 with “Overweight”. The stock has “Buy” rating by Sterne Agee CRT on Friday, October 2. Cowen & Co initiated the shares of CSTM in report on Monday, September 21 with “Market Perform” rating. On Friday, May 20 the stock rating was downgraded by Societe Generale to “Hold”. Deutsche Bank maintained the stock with “Buy” rating in Monday, October 5 report. The rating was initiated by Seaport Global on Friday, September 9 with “Neutral”. The rating was upgraded by Seaport Global on Wednesday, November 23 to “Buy”.
Among 9 analysts covering CAE Inc. (NYSE:CAE), 4 have Buy rating, 1 Sell and 4 Hold. Therefore 44% are positive. CAE Inc. had 15 analyst reports since August 13, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. The stock of Cae Inc (USA) (NYSE:CAE) earned “Hold” rating by Zacks on Wednesday, August 26. The rating was downgraded by Zacks on Tuesday, September 1 to “Hold”. The firm has “Outperform” rating given on Friday, May 6 by National Bank Canada. The rating was upgraded by Zacks to “Sell” on Friday, August 14. The rating was upgraded by BMO Capital Markets on Friday, February 12 to “Outperform”. The stock of Cae Inc (USA) (NYSE:CAE) has “Market Perform” rating given on Friday, May 20 by BMO Capital Markets. As per Friday, November 11, the company rating was downgraded by RBC Capital Markets. As per Friday, May 27, the company rating was upgraded by Macquarie Research. The firm has “Outperform” rating by IBC given on Monday, January 4. Desjardins Securities upgraded the stock to “Buy” rating in Thursday, August 13 report.
Qs Investors Llc increased Blue Buffalo Pet Prods Inc stake by 30,800 shares to 30,816 valued at $741,000 in 2016Q4. It also upped Express Scripts Hldg Co (NASDAQ:ESRX) stake by 6,432 shares and now owns 217,444 shares. Ishares Tr (IWB) was raised too. 








By Kurt Siggers
Echostar Corporation-Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.








 

 




 
Free Newsletter Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:






  Recent Posts 

Evolent Health (EVH) At $24.55 Forms Top, Granite Construction (GVA)’s Sentiment Is 1.31


Parker Drilling Company (PKD) Reaches $1.20 52-Week Low; Bioscrip (BIOS) Shorts Lowered By 1.46%


Genesee Valley Trust Company Has Cut The Priceline Group (PCLN) Holding By $544,980, BIOCORRX (BICX) SI Decreased By 81.82%


Matthew 25 Management Has Lowered Scripps Networks Interactive (SNI) Position By $2.31 Million, Rand Wealth Has Increased Automatic Data Processing In (ADP) Holding By $1.08 Million


Fonar (FONR) Reaches $26.05 After 5.00% Down Move, MGIC Investment Corp. (MTG) Had 7 Analysts Last Week


Resources Connection, Inc. (RECN) Reaches $13.65 After 3.00% Up Move, Acadian Timber (TSE:ADN) Had 2 Bullish Analysts


Green Square Capital Has Lifted Its At&T Com (T) Position; Bbt Capital Management Has Upped Amc Networks (Call) (AMCX) Stake By $520,000


American Capital Management Cut Its Verint Systems (VRNT) Holding; Deutsche Lufthansa AG (ETR:LHA) Covered By 7 Bullish Analysts Last Week


Lowe Brockenbrough & Company Has Cut By $1.20 Million Its Cvs Health Com (CVS) Position, 3 Analysts Covering Compass Diversified Holdings (CODI)


Davidson D A & Company Lifted Amgen (AMGN) Stake, Last Week Orion Group Holdings (ORN) Analysts







© Copyright 2015-2017 Bibey Post Inc - bibeypost.com       About - Our Team - Contact














Trexquant Investment LP: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback


























trexquant investment lp
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Trexquant Investment LP operates as an investment management company. The Company offers asset management, trading programs, investment strategies, financial planning, and advisory services. Trexquant Investment serves customers in the State of Connecticut.




Corporate Information
Address:

300 1st Stamford Place
4th Floor East
Stamford, CT 06902
United States


Phone:
1-203-817-0551


Fax:
1-860-986-6292


Web url:
www.trexquant.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Tyger Park


Chief Executive Officer




Michael Marinic


Chief Operating Officer




Adam Zelinski


Chief Trading Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data








































Trexquant Investment LP | Our Process

























 














We use thousands of models to trade thousands of stocks Trexquant translates investment ideas into trading programs (Alphas). Inspiration can come from many sources. Academic publications, observation, statistical analysis, news, experience: researchers can draw upon all of these elements to create Alphas.

Thousands of Alphas compete for an allocation in order to generate consistent risk-adjusted performance.
Our researchers collaborate freely to accelerate discovery
Our researchers are responsible for creating the programs that generate investment returns. They are given the freedom to explore and think differently. A collaborative environment means that individual expertise is shared to strengthen the aggregate result.

Our research platform was designed to maximize efficiency. Researchers can transform ideas into tradable Alphas quickly and tune them with the guidance of Experienced developers.
We strive to improve our methodology continuously
We promote a culture of constant development. Every day is an
opportunity to increase our understanding of markets and trading.

Discover and implement new and orthogonal Alphas
Methods of combining Alphas in dynamic and intelligent ways
Assess new data, market venues, execution methods, and technology that may improve our performance





















Trexquant Investment LP | Our Process

























 














We use thousands of models to trade thousands of stocks Trexquant translates investment ideas into trading programs (Alphas). Inspiration can come from many sources. Academic publications, observation, statistical analysis, news, experience: researchers can draw upon all of these elements to create Alphas.

Thousands of Alphas compete for an allocation in order to generate consistent risk-adjusted performance.
Our researchers collaborate freely to accelerate discovery
Our researchers are responsible for creating the programs that generate investment returns. They are given the freedom to explore and think differently. A collaborative environment means that individual expertise is shared to strengthen the aggregate result.

Our research platform was designed to maximize efficiency. Researchers can transform ideas into tradable Alphas quickly and tune them with the guidance of Experienced developers.
We strive to improve our methodology continuously
We promote a culture of constant development. Every day is an
opportunity to increase our understanding of markets and trading.

Discover and implement new and orthogonal Alphas
Methods of combining Alphas in dynamic and intelligent ways
Assess new data, market venues, execution methods, and technology that may improve our performance






















Head to Head Comparison: Avon Products (NYSE:AVP) and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) (NLS) | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















Avon Products Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Avon Products Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Enterprise Bancorp (EBTC) Getting Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Study Shows					

Somewhat Positive Press Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect tronc (NASDAQ:TRNC) Stock Price					

Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact MidWestOne Financial Group (MOFG) Share Price					

Hanesbrands Inc. (HBI) Upgraded at BidaskClub					

Green Dot Corporation (GDOT) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

Curtiss-Wright Corporation (CW) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance					

Federated Investors, Inc. (NYSE:FII) Rating Lowered to Hold at BidaskClub					

Permian Basin Royalty Trust (NYSE:PBT) Earns Daily News Impact Rating of 0.04					

Kraton Corporation (KRA) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

FirstEnergy Corporation (FE) Stock Rating Upgraded by BidaskClub					

Jefferies Group LLC Reiterates “Buy” Rating for Huntsman Corporation (HUN)					

Orange SA (ORAN) & ATN International (ATNI) Head to Head Review					

BidaskClub Lowers EQT Midstream Partners, LP (EQM) to Sell					

DHT Holdings, Inc. (DHT) Lowered to “Sell” at BidaskClub					

Comparing Ares Commercial Real Estate Corporation (ACRE) & American Capital Mortgage Investment Corp. (MTGE)					

Ferrellgas Partners, L.P. (NYSE:FGP) Getting Somewhat Positive News Coverage, Analysis Shows					

BidaskClub Downgrades Houlihan Lokey, Inc. (NYSE:HLI) to Buy					

Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Arrow Financial Corporation (AROW) Share Price					

Exchange Income Co. (EIF) Insider Buys C$25,029.90 in Stock					

Consolidated Communications Holdings (CNSL) and Chunghwa Telecom Co. (CHT) Critical Survey					





 





						Head to Head Comparison: Avon Products (NYSE:AVP) and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) (NLS)					

						 July 27th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Tyrone Williams 


							Filed Under: Comparison Articles - Finance 







Tweet










Avon Products (NYSE: AVP) and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) (NYSE:NLS) are both small-cap consumer staples companies, but which is the superior stock? We will compare the two businesses based on the strength of their earnings, analyst recommendations, institutional ownership, dividends, risk, valuation and profitabiliy. 
Analyst Ratings
This is a summary of current recommendations for Avon Products and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The), as provided by MarketBeat. 



Sell Ratings
Hold Ratings
Buy Ratings
Strong Buy Ratings
Rating Score


Avon Products
0
3
2
0
2.40


Nautilus Group, Inc. (The)
0
2
3
0
2.60






Avon Products currently has a consensus target price of $5.90, suggesting a potential upside of 59.46%. Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) has a consensus target price of $21.90, suggesting a potential upside of 14.96%. Given Avon Products’  higher possible upside, equities research analysts clearly believe Avon Products is more favorable than Nautilus Group, Inc. (The).
Risk and Volatility
Avon Products has a beta of 1.83, indicating that its share price is 83% more volatile than the S&P 500. Comparatively, Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) has a beta of 2.08, indicating that its share price is 108% more volatile than the S&P 500. 
Profitability
This table compares Avon Products and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The)’s net margins, return on equity and return on assets.



Net Margins
Return on Equity
Return on Assets


Avon Products
0.26%
-3.68%
0.83%


Nautilus Group, Inc. (The)
7.49%
18.71%
9.40%


Valuation & Earnings
This table compares Avon Products and Nautilus Group, Inc. (The)’s top-line revenue, earnings per share (EPS) and valuation.



Gross Revenue
Price/Sales Ratio
EBITDA
Earnings Per Share
Price/Earnings Ratio


Avon Products
$5.74 billion
0.28
$437.20 million
($0.01)
-369.63


Nautilus Group, Inc. (The)
$398.36 million
1.47
$55.56 million
$0.95
20.05


Avon Products has higher revenue and earnings than Nautilus Group, Inc. (The). Avon Products is trading at a lower price-to-earnings ratio than Nautilus Group, Inc. (The), indicating that it is currently the more affordable of the two stocks. 
Insider & Institutional Ownership
87.1% of Avon Products shares are owned by institutional investors. Comparatively, 98.2% of Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) shares are owned by institutional investors. 1.3% of Avon Products shares are owned by company insiders. Comparatively, 3.7% of Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) shares are owned by company insiders. Strong institutional ownership is an indication that large money managers, hedge funds and endowments believe a company is poised for long-term growth.
Summary
Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) beats Avon Products on 10 of the 14 factors compared between the two stocks.
Avon Products Company Profile
Avon Products, Inc. is a manufacturer and marketer of beauty and related products. The Company’s segments include Europe, Middle East & Africa; South Latin America; North Latin America, and Asia Pacific. Its product categories are Beauty, and Fashion and Home. Beauty consists of skincare (which includes personal care), fragrance and color (cosmetics). Fashion and Home consists of fashion jewelry, watches, apparel, footwear, accessories, gift and decorative products, housewares, entertainment and leisure products, children’s products and nutritional products. The Company’s products include Anew Ultimate Supreme Advanced Performance Creme, Anew Vitale Visible Perfection Blurring Treatment, Big & Multiplied Volume Mascara, Avon True Perfectly Matte Lipstick, Avon Life for Him and for Her Fragrances, Far Away Infinity Fragrance and Avon Nutra Effects body collection with Active Seed Complex. The Company primarily sells its products to the consumer through the direct-selling channel.
Nautilus Group, Inc. (The) Company Profile
Nautilus, Inc. is a consumer fitness products company. The Company operates through two segments: Direct and Retail. Its principal business activities include designing, developing, sourcing and marketing of cardio and strength fitness products and related accessories for consumer use, primarily in the United States and Canada, but also in international markets outside North America. The Direct business offers products directly to consumers through television advertising, catalogs and the Internet. In its Direct business, the Company markets and sells its products, principally Bowflex cardio and strength products, directly to consumers. The Retail business offers its products through a network of independent retail companies and specialty retailers with stores and Websites located in the United States and internationally. In its Retail business, the Company markets and sells a line of consumer fitness equipment under the Nautilus, Octane Fitness, Schwinn, Universal and Bowflex brands.





Receive News & Ratings for Avon Products Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Avon Products Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 



























































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Trexquant Investment LP | Disclaimer























 














Disclaimer
This website is a resource for audiences such as potential employees, counterparties and industry participants. Under no circumstances, should any information presented on this website be used or construed as an offer, or solicitation of any offer, or other form of invitation or inducement to sell or buy any securities or other investments, or to provide advice regarding investments.




















Trexquant Investment LP | Contact Us
























 
















Contact Us

Trexquant Investment LP
300 First Stamford Place
Fourth Floor East
Stamford, CT 06902
info@trexquant.com


Parking
Visitors are able to park on the B2 level of the underground parking structure. Upon entering the First Stamford Place complex, follow the driveway towards the Hilton Hotel. The entrance for the underground parking structure will be on the left side as you pass the office buildings and near the hotel. Proceed to the B2 level labeled VISITORS / GUESTS and press the intercom button to inform security that you are visiting Trexquant. Please look for signs for the 300 Building.
From the Stamford Train Station
We are about a 10 minute walk from the Stamford Train Station. Upon arrival, walk South-West on S State Street (towards New York City) and cross Washington Boulevard and Greenwich Avenue. Once you have entered the First Stamford Place complex, we are in the first building on the left (Building 300).






































920,589 Shares in Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (BUFF) Acquired by Marathon Asset Management LLP - Watch List News



















































Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology




















Blue Buffalo Pet Products Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Blue Buffalo Pet Products Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



Landstar System, Inc. (NASDAQ:LSTR) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

Lowe’s Companies, Inc. (LOW) Rating Lowered to Strong Sell at BidaskClub					

BidaskClub Downgrades Lincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:LECO) to Buy					

KapStone Paper and Packaging Corporation (KS) Rating Increased to Buy at BidaskClub					

KLX Inc. (NASDAQ:KLXI) Downgraded to Hold at BidaskClub					

The KEYW Holding Corporation (KEYW) Downgraded by BidaskClub to “Sell”					

KAR Auction Services, Inc (NYSE:KAR) Lifted to Sell at BidaskClub					

Investors Bancorp, Inc. (NASDAQ:ISBC) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Strong Sell					

International Game Technology (NYSE:IGT) Upgraded by BidaskClub to “Hold”					

Hercules Capital, Inc. (NYSE:HTGC) Rating Lowered to Buy at BidaskClub					

J & J Snack Foods Corp. (JJSF) Stock Rating Upgraded by BidaskClub					

HD Supply Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:HDS) Raised to Sell at BidaskClub					

Inter Parfums, Inc. (IPAR) Rating Increased to Buy at BidaskClub					

Kaiser Aluminum Corporation (KALU) Rating Increased to Strong-Buy at BidaskClub					

Intel Corporation (NASDAQ:INTC) Lifted to Sell at BidaskClub					

Integra LifeSciences Holdings Corporation (IART) Downgraded by BidaskClub					

Intuitive Surgical, Inc. (ISRG) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Buy					

INC Research Holdings, Inc. (INCR) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

James River Group Holdings, Ltd. (NASDAQ:JRVR) Upgraded at BidaskClub					

HealthEquity, Inc. (HQY) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014




 




						920,589 Shares in Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (BUFF) Acquired by Marathon Asset Management LLP					

						 July 18th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Investing - SEC Filing Articles 






Tweet










Marathon Asset Management LLP purchased a new stake in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (NASDAQ:BUFF) during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The institutional investor  purchased 920,589 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $20,999,000. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Russell Investments Group Ltd. bought a new position in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products during the fourth quarter valued at $134,000.  State Board of Administration of Florida Retirement System increased its position in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products by 16.4% in the fourth quarter. State Board of Administration of Florida Retirement System now owns 50,895 shares of the company’s stock valued at $1,224,000 after buying an additional 7,162 shares during the period.  State Street Corp increased its position in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products by 6.1% in the fourth quarter. State Street Corp now owns 747,772 shares of the company’s stock valued at $17,981,000 after buying an additional 42,803 shares during the period.  Dimensional Fund Advisors LP increased its position in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products by 67.4% in the fourth quarter. Dimensional Fund Advisors LP now owns 603,176 shares of the company’s stock valued at $14,500,000 after buying an additional 242,844 shares during the period.  Finally, Envestnet Asset Management Inc. increased its position in  Blue Buffalo Pet Products by 54.4% in the fourth quarter. Envestnet Asset Management Inc. now owns 5,019 shares of the company’s stock valued at $121,000 after buying an additional 1,769 shares during the period. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own  88.38% of the company’s stock. 
Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (NASDAQ:BUFF) traded up 0.09% during mid-day trading on Tuesday, reaching $23.03. 312,729 shares of the company’s stock were exchanged. Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. has a 1-year low of $21.60 and a 1-year high of $27.50. The firm’s 50-day moving average is $23.52 and its 200 day moving average is $24.14. The stock has a market capitalization of $4.53 billion, a PE ratio of 33.87 and a beta of 1.97. 




Blue Buffalo Pet Products (NASDAQ:BUFF) last announced its earnings results on Tuesday, May 9th. The company reported $0.23 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.22 by $0.01. The company had revenue of $302 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $300.27 million. Blue Buffalo Pet Products had a net margin of 11.69% and a return on equity of 122.62%. The firm’s quarterly revenue was up 7.9% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the previous year, the business posted $0.19 earnings per share.  Analysts forecast that  Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. will post $0.92 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: “920,589 Shares in Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (BUFF) Acquired by Marathon Asset Management LLP” was originally  posted by Watch List News and is owned by of Watch List News. If you are accessing this piece of content on another publication, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of U.S. & international copyright & trademark law. The legal version of this piece of content can be accessed at https://www.watchlistnews.com/920589-shares-in-blue-buffalo-pet-products-inc-buff-acquired-by-marathon-asset-management-llp/1449807.html. 
Several research analysts recently weighed in on BUFF shares. Susquehanna Bancshares Inc  set a $34.00 price target on shares of Blue Buffalo Pet Products and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research report on Monday, March 20th. Citigroup Inc. upgraded shares of Blue Buffalo Pet Products from a “buy” rating to a “top pick” rating in a research report on Tuesday, April 18th. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Blue Buffalo Pet Products from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Thursday, May 11th. Off Wall Street initiated coverage on shares of Blue Buffalo Pet Products in a report on Wednesday, June 21st. They issued a “sell” rating for the company. Finally, Imperial Capital initiated coverage on shares of Blue Buffalo Pet Products in a report on Wednesday, June 28th. They issued an “outperform” rating and a $30.00 price objective for the company. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, two have issued  a hold rating, six have given a buy rating and one  has issued  a strong buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock presently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $28.40.
About Blue Buffalo Pet Products
Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc (BBPP) is a holding company. The Company operates as a pet food company. The Company, through its subsidiaries, develops, produces, markets and sells pet food under product lines, including BLUE Life Protection Formula, BLUE Wilderness, BLUE Basics, BLUE Freedom and BLUE Natural Veterinary Diet lines.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding BUFF? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Blue Buffalo Pet Products, Inc. (NASDAQ:BUFF).



Receive News & Ratings for Blue Buffalo Pet Products Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Blue Buffalo Pet Products Inc. and related companies with Analyst Ratings Network's FREE daily email newsletter.



 










Nicole Kennedy 























 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Sirius XM Making Big Investment In Pandora





Tax Reform Not Going Quite As Planned





Western Digital Files Lawsuit To Halt Toshiba Chip Business Sale





Sinclair Broadcast Group Announces Deal For Tribune Media





Starbucks Has A Hit With Its Unicorn Frappuccino











			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 
















































TD Ameritrade Review | StockBrokers.com




























StockBrokers.com

menu



StockBrokers.com
×


close



Guides


Reviews



Compare


attach_money Offers


Search




























Best Of
11 Best Online Brokers
8 Best Robo Advisors
2017 Broker Rankings


Style
6 Best Discount Brokers
5 Best Options Brokers
Beginner Investors
Penny Stocks Trading


Tools
5 Best Mobile Trading Apps
5 Best Day Trading Brokers




Popular Stock Brokers
TD Ameritrade
Fidelity
Charles Schwab
ETRADE
Merrill Edge


Popular Robo-Advisors
Betterment
Wealthfront
Personal Capital

 








TD Ameritrade Review






								Open an account today.

Get Started







×

Ally Invest
Charles Schwab
ChoiceTrade
Capital One Investing
E*TRADE
Firstrade
Fidelity Investments
Interactive Brokers
Just2Trade
Lightspeed Trading
Merrill Edge
OptionsHouse
Robinhood
Scottrade
SogoTrade
TradeStation Securities
TD Ameritrade






						Open an account today.
					
Get Started
















































keyboard_arrow_left
keyboard_arrow_right










Overall
TD Ameritrade charges more than its competitors but delivers with fantastic platforms, research, mobile apps, education, and customer service. The all-round experience makes TD Ameritrade our #1 broker for 2017.


						By Blain Reinkensmeyer
						 /
												
							February 21st, 2017						
												 /
						Updated:
						
							June 1st, 2017						
					




Likes
Fantastic platforms, thinkorswim and Trade ArchitectRich research and education offeringsIndustry- leading customer service 

Dislikes
Pricey stock and options commissionsShort-term trading fee charged if a commission-free ETF is sold within 30 days of purchase 
 Exclusive Offer - TD Ameritrade
						Trade free for 90 days + get up to $600 Learn More 





Review Sections:


Commissions & Fees


Customer Service


Research


Ease of Use


Platforms & Tools


Mobile Trading


Other Notes


Final Thoughts


Methodology


Data:


Fees & Features














Home


Reviews


TD Ameritrade


In the process of searching for a well-rounded broker, finding the right mix is no easy task. Trade costs, trade platforms, tools, research, and customer service all are important to investors.
After using a TD Ameritrade account, you cannot help but love the overall experience. The broker charges $6.95 per trade, almost twice that of some of the cheaper discount brokers. However, the value and quality delivered is so superior it easily justifies the higher price tag.
Commissions & Fees

While having access to 24/7 customer support, advanced trade platforms, ample research, real-time streaming quotes site wide and more is great; unfortunately, it is expensive. TD Ameritrade charges a flat rate of $6.95 per trade, with options costing $6.95, plus $.75 per contract.
Compared to other full-service brokers, TD Ameritrade is on par with ETRADE, but is more expensive than the rest, including Charles Schwab, Fidelity, and Scottrade. In fact, considering margin costs, TD Ameritrade is the most expensive broker out of the 16 included in our 2017 Review.
TD AmeritradeE*TRADECharles SchwabFidelity Stock Trade Fee (flat)$6.95$6.95$4.95$4.95Options Base Fee$6.95$6.95$4.95$4.95Options Per Contract Fee$0.75$0.75$0.65$0.65Mutual Fund Trade Fee$49.99$19.99$76.00$49.95Broker Assisted Trades Fee$44.99$25.00$25.00$32.95Commission Free ETFs10113322991Commissions & Fees 2.5 Stars  2.5 Stars  3.5 Stars  3 Stars 
One bright spot is that TD Ameritrade offers 101 commission-free ETFs (Charles Schwab offers the most, with 229). The only caveat is that, with TD Ameritrade, any commission-free ETF that is sold within 30 days of purchase is subject to a short-term trading fee of $19.99.
UPDATE 03/06/17 – TD Ameritrade reduced its equity commissions. Equity trades, including stocks and ETFs, have been lowered to $6.95 per trade (previously $9.99). Since these new rates were announced after the 2017 Review was published, they are not incorporated into TD Ameritrade's star rating for this category. 
Customer Service

If having access to 24/7 customer support by phone and email is important to you, then TD Ameritrade has you covered. The broker posted fantastic results for phone and email during testing for our 2017 Review, finishing No. 1 and No. 3, respectively.
When it comes to support, the bottom line is that for a full-service broker, great customer service is expected, and TD Ameritrade delivers, regardless of the communication avenue.
During our phone tests, our average wait time was less than two minutes. The reps were very well trained. Every test call we made to TD Ameritrade, regardless of the day or time, was answered by a customer service agent who identified him/herself, provided a pleasant introduction, and always left us with a warm closing note (e.g., “Have a great day”). All our questions were always answered, so it was not surprising to see TD Ameritrade end up No. 1 for phone customer service out of 16 brokers.
Email testing was also a great experience. All our emails were returned within 12 hours, on average. In fact, in one test, TD Ameritrade responded to our multi-question support inquiry in a blazingly fast 11 minutes.  Customer service agents were clearly well trained, as email templates were consistent and thorough. Of all our eight email tests, two resulted in a “good” overall score, with the rest being “great.” TD Ameritrade finished third for email.
Live chat support is also offered, but only for clients seeking platform support while using thinkorswim, or for potential clients who navigate around the site long enough to trigger a live chat popup. Knowing how the web is evolving and how millennials prefer to communicate, I would like to see TD Ameritrade offer live chat support for all clients and potential clients. TD Ameritrade finished third for live chat.
When it comes to support, the bottom line is that for a full-service broker, great customer service is expected, and TD Ameritrade delivers, regardless of the communication avenue. TD Ameritrade finished first overall for Customer Service in our 2017 Review.
Research

Like its biggest competitors, Fidelity, Charles Schwab, and ETRADE, TD Ameritrade has a substantial research offering. 
TD AmeritradeFidelity E*TRADEMerrill EdgeCharles SchwabEquity Research - Social Yes  Yes  Yes  No  Yes Equity Research - Metric Comparisons Yes  Yes  No  Yes  Yes Equity Research - Reports712438ETF Research - Reports Yes  Yes  Yes  Yes  Yes Mutual Fund Research - Reports Yes  No  Yes  Yes  Yes 
When I pulled up a quote for Apple (AAPL), I found a clean spread of relevant data, including seven different third-party research reports to choose from and read, which is the third highest number in the industry (Fidelity offers 12). The featured research report provider is ResearchTeam, which combines five research providers into one.

Providing clients quality research is an extremely competitive challenge. Of all the functionality provided on the website, I found TD Ameritrade had two outstanding functions: the Social Signals tab and the Peer Comparison tab. Powered by LikeFolio, Social Signals displays both a real-time streaming feed of algorithmically filtered brand-relevant tweets – which I found much better than seeing a list of recent StockTwits tweets – and a summary chart of the most-tweeted brands. Naturally, Social Signals is best used for consumer-focused brands such as Apple (AAPL) or Nike (NKE). In thinkorswim (covered further down) the data can be charted for deeper analysis.

On the Peer Comparison tab, investors find a clean customizable chart showing the stock’s performance against its closest competitors followed by a comparison table of relevant metrics. Included competitors can also be shown or hidden. Clean peer comparisons are not easy to do, which is where TD Ameritrade stands out. Metrics included in the table are relevant and pruned to the most important. Social Signals data is also tied in; however, I found this data did not appear each time I loaded the page, and data was missing for certain securities. Data was marked as “New” during my testing, so I imagine the data will be worked out in time.

Social Signals and peer comparisons aside, I also enjoyed the on-site charting functionality. With 34 different technical indicators (volume, MACD, RSI, etc.) and easy-to-read, big charts, the experience is as clean as you will find anywhere. I could even pop out the chart into its own window to expand it across my 24-inch monitor. The only downside to the experience is the lack of panning flexibility on the chart itself. Charting is driven by provider SunGard, and my recommendation to TD Ameritrade would be to check out ChartIQ instead.

For the price customers pay per trade, excellent research should be expected. When all 51 variables for Research are considered, TD Ameritrade lacks only two features: displaying the total number of holdings for ETFs, and a country allocation chart for Mutual Funds. Impressive, to say the least. TD Ameritrade finished third behind Fidelity and Charles Schwab for Research in 2017. 
Ease of Use

Making research a seamless experience is just one part of TD Ameritrade’s efforts to make its website easy to use. The site-wide quote bar streams real-time quotes – functionality that Charles Schwab, ETRADE, and Fidelity do not offer – and includes SnapTicket, a quick trade extension that allows stock and option orders to be placed from any page on the site.

TD Ameritrade also offers a fully customizable sidebar, My Dock, which allows clients to display up to 13 different modules. Modules can be resorted or placed into separate columns, allowing clients with wide-screen monitors to maximize their workflow. While clean and easy to use, I found myself leaving the sidebar collapsed and hidden away. Despite having a 24-inch monitor capable of maximizing the experience, I found it to be a distraction.

I had to dig deep to find flaws in TD Ameritrade’s client experience.
I had to dig deep to find flaws in TD Ameritrade’s client experience. After many hours of testing and comparing, I found two disappointing items that stood out: The My Account Overview experience and adding additional accounts. The default My Account page is data rich but poorly laid out and I found it to be a poor launching pad into my usual workflow. Enabling My Dock in the sidebar did little to patch the user experience. Charles Schwab Trade Source and Fidelity’s new fully responsive Accounts experience are both superior; I know TD Ameritrade can do better.

For managing multiple accounts, I found that each new account I created required a completely new username and password. Once established and logged in, I could then link the new account to my primary user ID. This is a subtle difference from other brokers where you can simply create and add a new brokerage account to your same ID with no trouble. Minor? Yes. However, for clients with multiple accounts, it can be a confusing experience first time through.
Pickiness aside, TD Ameritrade’s platforms (discussed next) have both casual and active traders covered and the same two-pronged approach is applied to mobile, where two separate apps are offered. No doubt, TD Ameritrade shines in the category Ease of Use.
Platforms & Tools

While there are many attractive features in TD Ameritrade, the broker's two platforms are its bread and butter. The flagship platform, thinkorswim, used to be a standalone broker until TD Ameritrade acquired it in 2009.
TD AmeritradeFidelity E*TRADEMerrill EdgeCharles SchwabDesktop Platform (Windows) Yes  Yes  Yes  No  Yes Charting - Indicators / Studies3701661187340Charting - Drawing Tools2222242215Option Chains - Total Columns3326396234Watch Lists - Total Fields4018013021694
Thinkorswim is designed for advanced traders who want complete flexibility and depth. Furthermore, it can be used by any client with no minimums or specific trade criteria required for access. This is an important advantage over both Fidelity Active Trader Pro and ETRADE Pro, which both require minimums for access.

Run as a desktop application, thinkorswim is so advanced it is rivaled only by TradeStation. A few clicks of the mouse will have dozens of charts streaming real-time data, and even the pickiest trader will be satisfied with the 300+ technical studies available for each chart (highest in the industry), not to mention that each study can be customized thereafter.

Using thinkScript, thinkorswim’s proprietary coding language, traders can even create their own indicators. This is most like TradeStation’s EasyLanguage, which is the only other broker to offer such functionality.
It’s a dazzling array of choices that will set your mind spinning – in a good way.
TD Ameritrade's thinkorswim is also home to a slew of advanced tools. Whether it be company profiling, advanced earnings analysis, plotting FRED data, charting social sentiment, backtesting and replaying historical markets tick by tick, viewing economic and corporate calendars, creating and conducting real-time stock scans, sharing charts and workspace layouts, or performing advanced options analysis, the rabbit hole goes as far as any trader's imagination will take them. It’s a dazzling array of choices that will set your mind spinning – in a good way.

Focusing on the two most recent innovations, adding Federal Reserve Economic Data (FRED) and the new earnings analysis tool, investors can begin to appreciate the endless brain hub stationed at thinkorswim’s Chicago office. Starting with FRED, a publicly accessible US Government database of over 400,000 economic data points; think GDP, CPI, treasury rates, median household income, etc. FRED data is used by institutional investors, hedge funds, and other sophisticated trading operations. In its never-ending quest to level the playing field, the thinkorswim team decided to download all the data, process it, build a custom interface to graph it, and brought it to all TD Ameritrade clients free.

Make no mistake, what thinkorswim has accomplished is truly mind blowing. The only other way to view this data as seamlessly as thinkorswim is to pay up for a Bloomberg terminal.
Make no mistake, what thinkorswim has accomplished is truly mind blowing. The only other way to view this data as seamlessly as thinkorswim is to pay up for a Bloomberg terminal. Once a data set is loaded, it can be tweaked and customized, whichever way the user desires. For sophisticated investors, FRED data is extremely useful in assessing the overall health of the market or specific sectors, which is why institutions pay up to access it via Bloomberg. Thanks to thinkorswim, now any TD Ameritrade client can conduct the same analysis.
Alongside FRED analysis, thinkorswim also launched its new tool for conducting earnings analysis. In my personal trading career, I have analyzed thousands of earnings releases. Heading into an earnings event, the toughest and most time-consuming part is researching historical price action and volatility surrounding previous events, understanding how the earnings were estimated in the eyes of Wall Street, then gauging the significance of any beat or miss. Earnings analysis with thinkorswim does all of this in one clean interface.

Starting with the top row, five days of price action are plotted before and after each earnings release. Next, volatility is plotted over the same time span followed by an At The Money (ATM) straddle (extremely insightful data for options traders seeking patterns and outliers in options market behavior). Finally, using data from Wall Street analysts and crowd-sourced ratings from Estimize, EPS estimate ranges alongside actual results are clearly plotted, providing an efficient way of assessing the company’s results. The whole experience together brings clarity with much less noise. It’s magic.
Both FRED data and the new earnings analysis experience launched in 2016 are two examples of many where TD Ameritrade continues to innovate and push the envelope of what is available for traders.
Both FRED data and the new earnings analysis experience launched in 2016 are two examples of many where TD Ameritrade continues to innovate and push the envelope of what is available for traders. For casual and active traders, earnings analysis with thinkorswim is truly a work of art and the best new trader tool of 2017 in my books.
One of my gripes with thinkorswim back in 2013 and 2014 was the platform’s reliability during volatile markets. On highly volatile and active trading days when there would be a large influx of clients using the system, thinkorswim would lag noticeably – sometimes for lengthy periods. Growing pains are no fun, and while it took longer than clients had hoped for, thinkorswim addressed them all. Today, thanks to the thinkorswim reskin in 2015, alongside a slew of infrastructure updates in both 2015 and 2016, thinkorswim hums along with no trouble at all. In 2017, active traders should be confident relying on thinkorswim to provide a seamless experience, regardless of the market environment.
Platform thinkorswim aside, TD Ameritrade also has a web-based platform, Trade Architect, which is designed with more casual investors in mind. The tools and functionality are purposely kept simple, and the design is clean with visual flare. Everything ran smoothly in my Chrome browser, bug-free, and I quickly became a fan of the platform-wide streaming real-time quotes.

From testing every broker, the streaming watch list functionality Trade Architect offers is my favorite. It isn't just the superb layout, but also the flexibility, ease of use, and depth of data available. The layout is completely customizable, and it’s great having access to visual data such as quote trends, trade trends, 52-week range, and a strength meter.

The bottom line is simple: when it comes to Platforms & Tools in 2017, for the sixth year in a row, TD Ameritrade is on top.
Mobile Trading

With mobile trading, TD Ameritrade took a different approach by offering not one, but two smartphone apps: TD Ameritrade Mobile and TD Ameritrade Mobile Trader. TD Ameritrade Mobile is designed for new and casual investors, while TD Ameritrade Mobile Trader is designed for the feature-hungry active trader.
Having two separate apps has its noticeable pros and cons.
Having two separate apps has its noticeable pros and cons. On the pros side, the apps can hone in on their individual target users and provide a specific experience. On the cons side, it is easy to confuse the two apps initially and not know which one is right for you. Also, some of the functionality that is built for one could really be beneficial on the other, for example basic price alerts, so it can be tricky at times to find the right home as a client.

Looking at specific functionality, TD Ameritrade Mobile Trader is “where the magic happens,” so to speak. Advanced charting, with a staggering 328 different technical studies, is available alongside a full array of order options. An extremely smooth interface for advanced equities trades as well as a seamless experience for complex options trades are compelling features. In my view, this combination is the best in the industry.

In 2015, TD Ameritrade released in-app chat support and mobile desktop linking, both for the Mobile Trader app. In-app chat support allows users to use their mobile devices and chat with a customer service agent for live help, which includes screen sharing. Linking enables users to link the thinkorswim desktop platform to the Mobile Trader app. Click on the quotes tab, select a color next to the search bar that matches a chart or similar in thinkorswim, then pull up any quote, and thinkorswim will follow suite.
In 2016, the updates were across the board. With TD Ameritrade Mobile, highlights included Touch ID login alongside customized positions and watch list views, and the addition of Social Signals analysis. A Windows 10 app was also launched. For Mobile Trader, access to saved orders was added with deeper linking to thinkorswim desktop.

It would be great to see screening and advanced alerts added to TD Ameritrade’s Mobile Trader in 2017. In TD Ameritrade Mobile, it would also be nice to be able to chart portfolio performance against the overall market and be able to set basic price alerts.
When all 52 variables are factored in for the Mobile Trading category, TD Ameritrade came away with 95% of possible points in our 2017 Review, edging out long-time industry leader E*TRADE, and taking first place overall.
When all 52 variables are factored in for the Mobile Trading category, TD Ameritrade came away with 95% of possible points in our 2017 Review, edging out long-time industry leader E*TRADE, and taking first place overall.
Other Notes
Regarding TD Ameritrade’s educational offering, the company was again the only broker to ace the category in our 2017 Review and receive a perfect five-star rating. Over 200 videos are available, including endless education webinars and articles through thinkMoney magazine and The Ticker Tape. Content is organized into courses with quizzes and the chance to earn points alongside badges to encourage further learning.

TD Ameritrade also extends education into colleges across the United States with its annual thinkorswim Challenge. October 2016 was the third challenge, in which 726 teams across 49 states competed.
Finally yet importantly, TD Ameritrade entered the robo advisor space in 2016 with the launch of TD Ameritrade Essential Portfolios. Read our full review of TD Ameritrade Essential Portfolios.
Final Thoughts
TD Ameritrade is one of those companies that just gets it. They understand their clients and the value of a high-quality user experience, and they know what it takes to stay ahead of the competition.
Any investor, new or seasoned, will find TD Ameritrade a great fit for their needs. The main gripe with the broker is cost, but what you pay for is what you get, and the quality delivered by TD Ameritrade is, undoubtedly worth the extra few dollars per trade.
For online investing and trading in 2017, TD Ameritrade ranks #1 Overall.
Methodology
For our 2017 Stock Broker Review we assessed, rated, and ranked sixteen different online brokers over a period of six months. In total, we conducted 349 customer service tests, collected 5,277 data points, and produced over 40,000 words of research. How we test. 
View all TD Ameritrade Fees & Features 





								Reviewed by Blain Reinkensmeyer

							Blain heads research at StockBrokers.com and has been involved in the markets since placing his first stock trade back in 2001. He developed StockBrokers.com's annual review format seven years ago, a format broker executives consider the most thorough in the industry. Blain currently maintains funded accounts with more than a dozen different US-regulated online brokers and has executed thousands of trades throughout his career. He enjoys sharing his experiences through his personal blog, StockTrader.com.						






					Ratings
											
Overall




							Summary
						


Commissions & Fees





								Offering of Investments
								




								Platforms & Tools
								




								Research
								




								Customer Service
								




Mobile Trading





Ease of Use





Education





Order Execution





								Banking
								




Active Trading





Options Trading





New Investors









								Best in Class
							



2017


																										 1												


Overall






Overall
Offering of Investments
Platforms & Tools
Research
Customer Service
Mobile Trading
Ease of Use
Investor Education
Active Trading
Options Trading
New Investors





2016


																										 2												


Overall






Overall
Offering of Investments
Platforms & Tools
Research
Customer Service
Mobile Trading
Ease of Use
Investor Education
Active Trading
Options Trading
New Investors





2015


																										 1												


Overall






Overall
Offering of Investments
Platforms & Tools
Research
Customer Service
Mobile Trading
Ease of Use
Investor Education
Active Trading
Options Trading
New Investors





2014


																										 1												


Overall






Overall
Platforms & Tools
Research
Customer Service
Mobile Trading
Ease of Use
Investor Education
Active Trading
Options Trading
New Investors





2013


																										 1												


Overall






Overall
Platforms & Tools
Research
Customer Service
Mobile Trading
Ease of Use
Investor Education
Active Trading
Options Trading
New Investors










Compare TD Ameritrade

									Find out how TD Ameritrade stacks up against other brokers.
								




TD Ameritrade vs Ally Invest
TD Ameritrade vs Charles Schwab
TD Ameritrade vs ChoiceTrade
TD Ameritrade vs Capital One Investing
TD Ameritrade vs E*TRADE
TD Ameritrade vs Firstrade
TD Ameritrade vs Fidelity Investments
TD Ameritrade vs Interactive Brokers
TD Ameritrade vs Just2Trade
TD Ameritrade vs Lightspeed Trading
TD Ameritrade vs Merrill Edge
TD Ameritrade vs OptionsHouse
TD Ameritrade vs Robinhood
TD Ameritrade vs Scottrade
TD Ameritrade vs SogoTrade
TD Ameritrade vs TradeStation Securities






TD Ameritrade Competitors

									Select one or more of these brokers to compare against TD Ameritrade.
								









check




check




check




check











							All pricing data was obtained from a published web site as of 2/20/2017 and is believed to be accurate, but is not guaranteed. The StockBrokers.com staff is constantly working with its online broker representatives to obtain the latest pricing data. If you believe any data listed above is inaccurate, please contact us using the link at the bottom of this page. For stock trade rates, advertised pricing is for a standard order size of 500 shares of stock priced at $30 per share. For options orders, an options regulatory fee per contract may apply.
			
			TD Ameritrade, Inc. and StockBrokers.com are separate, unaffiliated companies and are not responsible for each other’s services and products.

Options  are not suitable for all investors as the special risks inherent to options trading may expose investors to potentially rapid and substantial losses. Options trading privileges subject to TD Ameritrade review and approval.  Please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options before investing in options.

Offer valid for one new Individual, Joint or IRA TD Ameritrade account opened by 09/30/2017 and funded within 60 calendar days of account opening with $3,000 or more. To receive $100 bonus, account must be funded with $25,000-$99,999. To receive $300 bonus, account must be funded with $100,000-$249,999. To receive $600 bonus, account must be funded with $250,000 or more. Offer is not valid on tax-exempt trusts, 401k accounts, Keogh plans, Profit Sharing Plan, or Money Purchase Plan.  Offer is not transferable and not valid with internal transfers, accounts managed by TD Ameritrade Investment Management, LLC, TD Ameritrade Institutional accounts, and current TD Ameritrade accounts or with other offers.  Qualified commission-free Internet equity, ETF or options orders will be limited to a maximum of 250 and must execute within 90 calendar days of account funding. Contract, exercise, and assignment fees still apply.  Limit one offer per client. Account value of the qualifying account must remain equal to, or greater than, the value after the net deposit was made (minus any losses due to trading or market volatility or margin debit balances) for 12 months, or TD Ameritrade may charge the account for the cost of the offer at its sole discretion. TD Ameritrade reserves the right to restrict or revoke this offer at any time. This is not an offer or solicitation in any jurisdiction where we are not authorized to do business. Please allow 3-5 business days for any cash deposits to post to account.  Taxes related to TD Ameritrade offers are your responsibility. Retail values totaling $600 or more during the calendar year will be included in your consolidated Form 1099. Please consult a legal or tax advisor for the most recent changes to the U.S. tax code and for rollover eligibility rules. (Offer Code 264)
 
TD Ameritrade Inc., member FINRA/SIPC. TD Ameritrade is a trademark jointly owned by TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. and The Toronto-Dominion Bank. © 2016 TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. All rights reserved. Used with permission.

		


arrow_drop_upBack to top







×















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































